Maryland, session 2026, HB0281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–551.
(a) The following facilities shall require employees and employers to obtain a
criminal history records check under this Part V of this subtitle:
(1) a child care center required to be licensed under Title 9.5, Subtitle 4 of
the Education Article;
(2) a family child care home or large family child care home required to be
registered under Title 9.5, Subtitle 3 of the Education Article;
(3) a child care home required to be licensed [under this subtitle or] under
Title 9 of the Human Services Article;
(4) A CHILD CARE INSTITUTION REQUIRED TO BE LICENSED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE BY AN ADMINISTRATION OF THE DEPARTMENT;
[(4)] (5) a child care institution required to be licensed [under this
subtitle or] under Title 9 of the Human Services Article;
[(5)] (6) a juvenile detention, correction, or treatment facility provided for
in Title 9 of the Human Services Article;
[(6)] (7) a public school as defined in Title 1 of the Education Article;
[(7)] (8) a private or nonpublic school required to report annually to the
State Board of Education under Title 2 of the Education Article;
[(8)] (9) a foster care family home or group facility as defined under this
subtitle;
[(9)] (10) a recreation center or recreation program operated by the State,
a local government, or a private entity primarily serving minors;
[(10)] (11) a day or residential camp, as defined in Title 10, Subtitle 16 of
the Code of Maryland Regulations, primarily serving minors; or

HOUSE BILL 281 3
[(11)] (12) a home health agency or residential service agency licensed by
the Maryland Department of Health and authorized under Title 19 of the Health – General
Article to provide home– or community–based health services for minors.
(b) The following individuals shall obtain a criminal history records check under
this Part V of this subtitle:
(1) an individual who is seeking to adopt a child through a child placement
agency;
(2) an individual who is seeking to become a guardian through a local
department;
(3) an individual whom the juvenile court appoints as a guardian of a child;
(4) an adult relative with whom a child, committed to a local department,
is placed by the local department;
(5) any adult known by a local department or the State Department of
Education to be residing in:
(i) a family child care home or large family child care home required
to be registered under this title;
(ii) a home where informal child care, as defined in child care subsidy
regulations adopted under Title 13A of the Code of Maryland Regulations, is being provided
or will be provided to a child who does not reside there;
(iii) a home of an adult relative of a child with whom the child,
committed to a local department, is placed by the local department;
(iv) a foster care home or child care home required to be approved
under this title;
(v) a home of an individual seeking to adopt a child through a child
placement agency; or
(vi) a home of an individual seeking to become a guardian through a
local department;
(6) an individual who agrees to provide, or to continue providing, informal
child care, as defined in child care subsidy regulations, adopted under Title 13A of the Code
of Maryland Regulations; [and]
(7) if requested by a local department:

HOUSE BILL 281
(i) a parent or guardian of a child who is committed to the local
department and is or has been placed in an out–of–home placement within the past year;
and
(ii) any adult known by the local department to be residing in the
home of the parent or guardian; AND
(8) AN ADULT OR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT A RELATIVE AND WHO
AGREES TO PROVIDE CARE AS A RESULT OF A SUDDEN UNAVAILABILITY OF THE
CHILD’S PRIMARY CARETAKER, INCLUDING:
(I) A NEIGHBOR;
(II) A FRIEND;
(III) AN ACQUAINTANCE;
(IV) A COMMUNITY MEMBER; OR
(V) A COLLEAGUE OR COWORKER OF THE CHILD’S PRIMARY
CARETAKER.
5–555.
(a) The Department shall conduct the criminal history records checks required
under this Part V of this subtitle.
(b) (1) The facilities identified in § 5–551(a) of this subtitle shall apply to the
Central Repository for a national and State criminal history records check for each
employee, employer, individual, or volunteer.
(2) As part of an application for a criminal history records check, a facility
identified in § 5–551(a) of this subtitle shall submit to the Central Repository:
(i) a legible set of the employee’s, employer’s, individual’s, or
volunteer’s fingerprints taken in a format approved by the Director of the Central
Repository and the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation;
(ii) the fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal
Procedure Article for access to State criminal history records; and
(iii) the mandatory processing fee required by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history records check.

HOUSE BILL 281 5
(3) In accordance with §§ 10–201 through 10–229 of the Criminal
Procedure Article, the Central Repository shall forward the employee’s, employer’s,
individual’s, or volunteer’s [criminal history record information to]:
(i) STATE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION TO the
employee, employer, individual, or volunteer; and
(ii) NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION TO
the authorized agencies required to license, register, approve, or certify the facility
identified in § 5–551(a) of this subtitle.
(c) The Department shall update an initial criminal history records check for an
employee, employer, or individual identified in § 5–551(b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subtitle and
issue an updated records check in accordance with this subsection.
(d) The Department shall provide an applicant’s initial and updated State
criminal history record to:
(1) the recipients of the State criminal history record specified in
subsection (e) of this section; and
(2) the State Department of Education if the applicant is:
(i) an employee of or an adult resident in a child care center that is
required to be licensed or to hold a letter of compliance under Title 9.5, Subtitle 4 of the
Education Article;
(ii) an employee of or an adult resident in a family child care home
or large family child care home that is required to be registered under Title 9.5, Subtitle 3
of the Education Article; or
(iii) an individual who provides or agrees to provide informal child
care or an adult who resides in a home where informal child care is being provided or will
be provided to a child who does not reside there.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, on receiving a
written request from an employee, the Department shall disseminate the national and
State criminal history records check to authorized agencies if the criminal history records
check was completed during the prior 180 days.
(2) On receiving a written request from a student teacher employed under
§ 6–107 of the Education Article, the Department shall disseminate the national and State
criminal history records check to authorized agencies if the criminal history records check
was completed during the prior 365 days.
(f) Information obtained from the Central Repository under this subtitle:

HOUSE BILL 281
(1) is confidential;
(2) may not be disseminated; and
(3) may be used only for the purposes authorized by this subtitle.
(g) The subject of a criminal history records check under this subtitle may contest
the contents of the national and State criminal history records check issued by the Central
Repository as provided in § 10–223 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
5–559.
(a) In this section, “emergency out–of–home placement” means an out–of–home
placement in which a local department places a child in the home of [a private individual,
including a neighbor, friend, or relative,] AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN § 5–551(B) OF
THIS SUBTITLE as a result of a sudden unavailability of the child’s primary caretaker.
(b) (1) [If] IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 5–551(B) OF
THIS SUBTITLE, IF a child is placed in an emergency out–of–home placement, a local
department may request that a designated State or local law enforcement agency in the
State [perform] CONDUCT a [federal] NATIONAL name–based check on any individual
described in [§ 5–551(b)(4), (5)(iii), and (7)(ii)] § 5–551(B) of this subtitle.
(2) The designated STATE OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT agency
described in paragraph (1) of this subsection may provide the results of the name–based
check to the local department.
(3) Within 15 calendar days after the [local department receives the results
of] DATE ON WHICH THE STATE OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY PROVIDES
CONDUCTS the name–based check, the local department shall submit a complete set of
fingerprints to the Department for each individual described in paragraph (1) of this
subsection on whom a name–based check was [performed] CONDUCTED.
(4) [Within 15 calendar days after the name–based check] ON RECEIPT
OF THE COMPLETE SET OF FINGERPRINTS DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, the Department shall perform a NATIONAL criminal history records check,
in accordance with § 5–555 of this subtitle.
(c) A child shall be removed immediately from an emergency out–of–home
placement if any individual required to submit to a name–based check refuses to submit
the follow–up fingerprints.

HOUSE BILL 281 7
(d) When the placement of a child in a home is denied as a result of a name–based
criminal history records check of an individual and the individual contests that denial, the
individual shall submit to the local department:
(1) a complete set of fingerprints; and
(2) written permission allowing the local department to forward the
fingerprints to the Department for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(e) An individual who is required to submit to a criminal history records check
under this section shall pay the fees required under § 5–551(g) of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.